District of Columbia statutes.
44-802

Authority to transmit data or information.

No person, health-care facility or agency, health professional association, or group practice providing any report, note, record, or other data or information, including advice, opinion, or testimony, to a peer review body shall be liable to any other person for damages or equitable relief by reason of providing such a report, note, record, or other data or information, unless the information provided was false and the person or entity providing the information knew the information was false.

History

Sept. 29, 1978, D.C. Law 2-112, § 3, 25 DCR 1471
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-234, § 2(b), 40 DCR 605

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-805.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-502.
1973 Ed., § 32-362.